Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1151.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 306(a.3)(1) of the act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act, is amended to read:Section 306. The following schedule of compensation is hereby established:* * *(a.3) (1) When an employe has received total disability compensation pursuant to clause (a) for a period of one hundred and four weeks, unless otherwise agreed to, the employe shall be required to submit to a medical examination which shall be requested by the insurer within sixty days upon the expiration 1234567891011121314151617181920 of the one hundred and four weeks to determine the degree of impairment due to the compensable injury, if any. The degree of impairment shall be determined based upon an evaluation by a physician who is licensed in this Commonwealth[,] and who is certified by an American Board of Medical Specialties-approved board or its osteopathic equivalent [and who is active in clinical practice for at least twenty hours per week], chosen by agreement of the parties, or as designated by the department, pursuant to the American Medical Association "Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment," 6th edition (second printing April 2009).* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1151PN1411 - 2 - 12345678910111213